District of Columbia statutes.
47-2508

Applicability of acts of Congress to national banks in the District of Columbia.

The provisions of all acts of Congress relating to national banks shall apply in the several states, the District of Columbia, the several territories and possessions of the United States, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

Sept. 8, 1959, 73 Stat. 458, Pub. L. 86-230, § 14
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2508.
1973 Ed., § 47-1710.